Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9300 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Diversity, equity, and inclusion” means any program, class,
system, curriculum, hiring practice, training, department, survey,
verbal or written directive or memo, or contract which uses
discrimination through equity action plans, forced compulsion from
constitutional freedoms of speech, expression, religion, or any
other freedom expressed in the United States Constitution, fails to
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1006 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prot ect every person with equal dignity and respect, or is meant to
indoctrinate or intimidate a person in any way into discrimination
of any kind;
2. “Indoctrinate” means to force or compel endorsement,
adoption, acceptance, or affirmation of any belief system, ideology,
theory, lifestyle, religion, non-religion, or philosophy by any
action, curriculum, training or instruction by using either directly
or commingling any taxpayer funds for these items; and
3. “State agency” means any board, commission, department,
office, or other instrumentality of the state supported in whole or
in part by public funds or entrusted with the expenditure of public
funds or administering or operating public property. The term shall
include the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
B. No state agency shall:
1. Grant or support any diversity, equity, and inclusion
positions, departments, activities, procedures, or programs to the
extent that they grant preferential treatment based on the
particular race, color, sex, ethnicity, or national origin of one
person over another;
2. Require any person to participate in, listen to, or receive
any education, training, activity, procedure, or programming to the
extent such education, training, activity, procedure, or programming
grants preferential treatment based on the particular race, color,
sex, ethnicity, or national origin of one person over another;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1006 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Require any person to swear, certify, or agree to any
loyalty oath that favors or prefers one particular race, color, sex,
ethnicity, or national origin over another;
4. Require any person to certify or declare agreement with,
recognition of, or adherence to any particular political,
philosophical, religious, or other ideological viewpoint; or
5. Require any applicant for employment to provide a diversity,
equity, and inclusion statement or give any applicant for employment
preferential consideration based on the provision of such a
diversity, equity, and inclusion statement.
C. The Office of the Attorney General shall enforce and may
promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section. Upon
the finding of a violation of this section, the Attorney General
shall report the details of the violation to the Governor, the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and the chairs of the Senate and House of
Representatives appropriations committees.
D. Upon receipt of a report pursuant to subsection C of this
section, the Legislature shall reduce the appropriation to the state
agency by one percent (1%) in the following fiscal year’s general
appropriations bill, if the agency receives appropriations from the
Legislature. If the agency does not regularly receive
appropriations from the Legislature, the agency shall increase the

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1006 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

amou nt the agency deposits into the General Revenue Fund by one
percent (1%).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1006 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)